Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.003

Terms of members—Filling vacancies.

The term of the member of the committee appointed by the State Bar Association, shall be for two years.

The term of any ex officio member expires upon expiration of tenure of the position by virtue of which he or she is a member of the committee. The remaining members of the committee shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority. Vacancies shall be filled by designation, appointment, or ex officio in the same manner as for the member so vacating, and if a vacancy results other than from expiration of a term, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term.

[ 2005 c 409 s 2; 1959 c 95 s 2; 1955 c 235 s 2; 1953 c 257 s 2; 1951 c 157 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 409: See note following RCW 1.08.001.